Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6729
Screening and review.

The department may conduct periodic and random screening or review of entities conducting competency assessments or courses and of the activities of applicants and medication aides as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the Medication Aide Act and the rules and regulations.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 19.